Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201354-1163
Hearing; determination;
factors; issuance of license.

The hearing required
by section 54-1162 shall be heard by the director and the State Veterinarian.
If the director and the State Veterinarian determine, after such
hearing, that the proposed livestock auction market would beneficially serve
the livestock economy, the department shall issue
a market license to the applicant. In determining whether or not the application
should be granted or denied, reasonable consideration shall be given to:

(1) The ability of the applicant to comply with the federal
Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921, 7 U.S.C. 181 et seq., as amended;

(2) The financial stability, business integrity, and fiduciary
responsibility of the applicant;

(3) The adequacy of the facilities described to permit the
performance of market services proposed in the application;

(4) The present needs for market services or additional services
as expressed by livestock growers and feeders in the community; and

(5) Whether the proposed livestock auction market would be
permanent and continuous.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 7, p. 965;

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 66;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 4.
September 6, 2013
Determination of Livestock Auction Board that license should be issued will not be disturbed if there is any evidence to support it. Midwest L. C. Co. v. Tri-State L. C. Co., 182 Neb. 41, 151 N.W.2d 908 (1967).